Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 2 Transfer of Conservatorship

29-5-125 through 29-5-128.
[Reserved]

History.

This part was based on Code 1981, §§

29-5-125

through 29-5-128, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95Repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 3/HB 954, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 563, § 3/HB 954 repealed and reserved this part, effective July 1, 2016.